Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.412

Issuance of cease and desist order.

The director may issue a cease and desist order to any person whom the director has reason to believe is engaged in an activity for which a license is required by this chapter. The person to whom such notice is issued may request an adjudicative proceeding to contest the order.

[ 2006 c 157 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 157: See note following RCW 15.36.012.